Oklahoma, session 2026, HB4478.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 5-129, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 5-129. A. The board of education of each school
district shall exercise control over all funds and revenues on hand
or hereafter received or collected, as herein provided, from student
or other extracurricular activities or other revenue-generating
sources listed in subsection B of this section that are conducted in
the school district. Such funds shall be deposited to the credit of
the account maintained for the benefit of the particular activity
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB4478 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

with in the school activity fund. Deposits of funds subject to the
requirements of this section shall be made by the end of the next
business day; however, if the deposit for a day totals less than One
Hundred Dollars ($100.00), a school district may accumulate monies
required to be deposited into the fund on a daily basis until when
the total accumulated balance of deposits equals or exceeds One
Hundred Dollars ($100.00) Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00). Provided,
a school district shall deposit accumulated monies into the fund not
less than one (1) time per business week, regardless of whether the
monies total One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) Five Hundred Dollars
($500.00). Disbursements from each of the activity accounts shall
be by check countersigned by the school activity fund custodian and
shall not be used for any purpose other than that for which the
account was originally created. The board of education, at the
beginning of each fiscal year and as needed during each fiscal year,
shall approve all school activity fund subaccounts, all subaccount
fund-raising fundraising activities and all purposes for which the
monies collected in each subaccount can be expended. Provided, the
board of education may direct by written resolution that any balance
in excess of the amount needed to fulfill the function or purpose
for which an account was established may be transferred to another
account by the custodian.
B. The board of education of each school district may designate
that any of the following revenue be deposited for the use of
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB4478 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

spec ific school activity accounts, or to a general activity fund
within the school activity fund:
1. Admissions to athletic contests, school or class plays,
carnivals, parties, dances and promenades;
2. Sale of student activity tickets;
3. Concession sales, including funds received from vending
concession contracts and school picture contracts approved by the
district board of education, and cafeteria or luncheon collections;
4. Dues, fees and donations to student clubs or other
organizations, provided that membership in such clubs or
organizations shall not be mandatory;
5. Income or revenue resulting from the operation of student
organizations or club projects, provided, such revenue is not
derived from the lease, rental or sale of property, supplies,
products or other assets belonging to the school district. When
approved by the board of education, student organizations or club
projects may include fund-raising fundraising activities, the
revenues from which may be used for the purpose of purchasing goods
or services otherwise considered to be general fund expenditures;
6. Deposits for or collections for the purchase of class
pictures, rings, pins, announcements, calling cards, annuals,
banquets, student insurance and other such personal items; provided
the cost of such items shall not be charged against other school
funds; and
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB4478 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

7. Other income collected for use by school personnel and other
school-related adult functions.
C. The board of education of each district may establish petty
cash accounts to be used only for the purpose of making small cash
expenditures, such as postage, freight or express charges; provided,
no single expenditure from a petty cash account shall be made in
excess of Seventy-five Dollars ($75.00), and the total expenditures
during any one (1) fiscal year shall not exceed Two Thousand Five
Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) per school building. The school
activity fund custodian shall initiate petty cash accounts by filing
a claim against the general fund of the school district for the
authorized amount of each petty cash account which shall not exceed
Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00) per school building. The general fund
warrants issued in payment of said claim shall be deposited in a
"Petty Cash Account" in the school activity fund.
All disbursements from the petty cash accounts shall be made in
the same manner as other disbursements from the school activity
fund, except no disbursement shall be made from a petty cash account
unless a prenumbered, dated receipt be obtained and signed by the
person receiving payment. A school board may designate a petty cash
custodian to countersign petty cash checks in place of the activity
fund custodian. The school activity fund custodian shall file
claims against the general fund of the school district for
reimbursement of a petty cash account whenever the need shall arise.
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB4478 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

Such claims shall be itemized in the same manner as other claims
filed against the general fund and shall have attached thereto the
receipts covering each of the expenditures claimed for
reimbursement. The total of a petty cash account balance and the
receipts on hand awaiting reimbursement should equal at all times
the authorized amount of a petty cash account.
None of the provisions pertaining to a petty cash account shall
be construed to authorize the use of one (1) fiscal year's fund to
pay obligations of another fiscal year. Any remaining balance in
each petty cash account shall be transferred to the general fund on
or before June 30 of each year.
D. The State Board of Education shall adopt appropriate rules
and regulations and design standard forms for the proper conduct of
the various school activity accounts.
E. The school activity fund custodian and the petty cash
custodian shall be appointed by the board of education of the school
district. The school activity fund custodian and the petty cash
custodian shall give a surety bond in an amount determined by the
board of education, but not less than One Thousand Dollars
($1,000.00). The premium of the surety bond shall be paid from the
school activity fund or the general fund.
F. The local board of education is hereby authorized to invest
activity funds as it determines appropriate. Upon direction of the
local board of education, the custodian of the activity fund shall
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB4478 SFLR Page 5
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

inve st activity funds in any or all of the investments permitted and
listed in Section 5-115 of this title.
G. The board of education of a school district may establish,
by board resolution, a general fund refund subaccount within the
school activity fund. The balance in the subaccount shall be
determined by need, and it shall be funded by refunds and
reimbursements received, including, but not limited to, rental
income, reimbursements for lost and damaged textbooks, summer school
and adult tuition, overpayments and tax refunds, as well as
transfers, by treasurer's check, from the school district general
fund. The subaccount may be expended only for the refund of
revenues previously received and deposited either into the
subaccount or directly into the general fund. Any remaining balance
in the refund subaccount shall be transferred to the school district
general fund on or before June 30 of each year.
H. The board of education of a school district may authorize
the custodian of the school activity funds to provide cash advances
to the sponsors for travel expenses on behalf of school district
students and sponsors of certain school activities. The cash
advances may only come from the school activity fund subaccount
directly involved in the travel of such students or sponsor and only
if the travel is one of the stated functions or purposes for the
establishment of the subaccount. Receipts for all expenditures of

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB4478 SFLR Page 6
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

the cash advances shall be kept and turned in to the custodian of
the school activity fund following said trip.
I. Any invoice submitted to a school district which is to be
paid from a school activity fund and is for payment of an authorized
expenditure in an amount equal to or greater than the threshold
amount stated in Section 310.9 of Title 62 of the Oklahoma Statutes
shall conform to the requirements set forth in that section.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON EDUCATION
April 14, 2026 - DO PASS















SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB4478 SFLR Page 7
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)